apertium-kfy.kfy.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Kumaoni

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    #d Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis
# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
## Example inflection pattern:
#NounRoot[-irr_a,-irr_b,-irr_c,-irr_d,-irr_e,-irr_f,-irr_g] RegNounInfl CaseSuffix?
NounRoot
NounRoot[reg] RegNounInfl
NounRoot[irr_a] IrrNounInfl_a
NounRoot[irr_b] IrrNounInfl_b
NounRoot[irr_c] IrrNounInfl_c
NounRoot[irr_d] IrrNounInfl_d
NounRoot[irr_e] IrrNounInfl_e
NounRoot[irr_f] IrrNounInfl_f
NounRoot[irr_g] IrrNounInfl_g
NounRoot[irr_h] IrrNounInfl_h
NounRoot[irr_i] IrrNounInfl_i
ProperNoun
Case
Number
Punctuation
Particle
Postposition
Determiner
Pronoun
Conjunction
Adjective
Adverb
Verb
Verb[pres1] Pres1Infl
Verb[pres23] Pres23Infl
Verb[past] PastInfl
Verb[fut1] Fut1Infl
Verb[fut23] Fut23Infl
Verb[perf] PerfInfl
Verb[cont] ContInfl
Verb[comp] CompInfl
IrregVerbs
IrregVerbs[pres1] Pres1Infl
IrregVerbs[pres23] Pres23Infl
IrregVerbs[past] PastInfl
IrregVerbs[fut1] Fut1Infl
IrregVerbs[fut23] Fut23Infl
IrregVerbs[perf] PerfInfl
IrregVerbs[cont] ContInfl
IrregVerbs[comp] CompInfl
Compound
Interjection


## Example inflection lexicon:
LEXICON RegNounInfl
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:>{R}न

LEXICON IrrNounInfl_a
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:>ा

LEXICON IrrNounInfl_b
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:>एँ

LEXICON IrrNounInfl_c
<n><sg>:>ा
<n><pl>:>े

LEXICON IrrNounInfl_d
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:>{I1}◌ं

LEXICON IrrNounInfl_e
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:>े◌ं

LEXICON IrrNounInfl_f
<n><sg>:>{I2}
<n><pl>:>{I3}याँ

LEXICON IrrNounInfl_g
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:>{I3}याँ

LEXICON IrrNounInfl_h
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:

LEXICON IrrNounInfl_i
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:>यो

LEXICON CaseSuffix
<abl>:थैं

LEXICON Pres1Infl
<v><sim>:
<v><pres><sim><p1><sg>:>नू

LEXICON Pres23Infl
<v><pres><sim><p2><sg>:>छै
<v><pres><sim><p2><sg><frm>:>छा
<v><pres><sim><p3><sg><m>:>छो
<v><pres><sim><p3><sg><f>:>{P1}
<v><pres><sim><p3><pl>:>नान

LEXICON PastInfl
<v><past><sim><p1><sg>:>छ
<v><past><sim><p2><sg>:>छ्य
<v><past><sim><p2><sg>:>छय  #Dir/LR
<v><past><sim><p2><sg><frm>:>छ्या
<v><past><sim><p2><pl>:>छ्या
<v><past><sim><p3><sg><m>:>छ्यो
<v><past><sim><p3><sg><f>:>छी
<v><past><sim><p3><sg><frm>:>छ्या
<v><past><sim><p3><pl>:>छ्या

LEXICON Fut1Infl
<v><fut><sim><p1><sg>:>{F1}ल
<v><fut><sim><p1><pl>:>{F1}ला 


LEXICON Fut23Infl
<v><fut><sim><p2><sg><m>:>ले
<v><fut><sim><p2><sg><f>:>ली
<v><fut><sim><p3><sg><m>:>लो
<v><fut><sim><p3><sg><f>:>ली
<v><fut><sim><p2><sg><frm>:>ला
<v><fut><sim><p3><sg><frm>:>ला
<v><fut><sim><p3><pl>:>ला

LEXICON PerfInfl
<v><pres><perf><p3><sg>:>ग्यो
<v><pres><perf><p3><pl>:>ग्या
<v><past><perf><p3><sg>:>ग्योछ
<v><past><perf><p3><pl>:>ग्यान

LEXICON CompInfl
<v>+भेरन<adv>:>भेरन    #after doing an action
<v>+भरेन<adv>:>भरेन   #Dir/LR

LEXICON ContInfl
<v><cont>:>नै



###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

## Example stem lexicon:

LEXICON NounRoot[irr_a]
काँण:काँण   #thorn
डाँण:डाँण   #hill/ mountain
डाण:डाण  #Dir/LR
जाड़:जाड़    #roots
भांणाक:भांणाक  #utensil
मछुवार:मछुवार     #fisherman
रोग:रोग   #illness
आँख:आँख  #Dir/LR
चमत्कार:चमत्कार   #miracle
मौत:मौत     #death
दिन:दिन     #day
डर:डर    #fear
उमर:उमर #age
आग:आग    #fire
आंग:आंग   #Dir/ LR
जाड़:जाड़    #cold / winter
ढ़ुग:ढ़ुग    #stone
ढूंग:ढूंग  #Dir/ LR
संसार:संसार     #Dir/LR 
कीड़:कीड़  #Dir/LR
देश:देश    #Dir/LR
देशो:देशो   #Dir/ LR
प्रदेश:प्रदेश #Dir/LR
घर:घर #Dir/LR
जाग:जाग    #Dir/LR
शैहर:शैहर #Dir/LR
आकाश:आकाश   #sky
मन्दिर:मन्दिर   #temple
शरीर:शरीर  #Dir/ LR

LEXICON NounRoot[irr_b]
कन्या:कन्या #girl
परीक्षा:परीक्षा     #test
इच्छा:इच्छा  #Dir/LR
हत्या:हत्या  #murder
सजा:सजा  #punishment
बरखा:बरखा   #rain
सभा:सभा  #meeting 
महासभा:महासभा  #assembly
प्रार्थना:प्रार्थना  #prayer
सेवा:सेवा  #service
चिन्ता:चिन्ता  #worry
कोशिश:कोशिश   #try
भूसा:भूस    #chaff
जूता:जूत     #shoes
किताब:किताब     #book
जहाज:जहाज     #ship
भाषा:भाषा     #language
कबर:कबर     #grave /tomb
योजना:योजना     #plan
पूजा:पूजा     #worship
हवा:हवा  #air/ breeze
रात:रात  #night
सेना:सेना   #army
यात्रा:यात्रा   #journey
संतान:संतान   #offspring


LEXICON NounRoot[irr_c]
बच्चा:बच्च # child 
मुकरदमा:मुकरदम  #lawsuit / legal case
चमड़ा:चमड़    #leather
हिस्सा:हिस्स  #part/ portion
प्रकार:प्रकार #Dir/LR
वादा:वाद  #promise
फैसला:फैसल  #decision
सिक्का:सिक्क  #coin
फ़ायदा:फ़ायद  #benifit
मेम्ना:मेम्न  #baby goat
ग्वाला:ग्वाल   #herdsman
हमला:हमल  #attack
गड्डा:गड्ड  #dent/ pit
लड़का:लड़क  #boy


LEXICON NounRoot[irr_d]
शिष्य:शिष्य     #Dir/LR 
गुरू:गुरू  #teacher
रूप:रूप     #form / appearance
भेष:भेष   #disguise
तारा:तारा #Dir/LR
आँख:आँख  #Dir / LR


LEXICON NounRoot[irr_e]
याद:याद  #memory
सन्तान:सन्तान    #offspring
चीज:चीज   #Dir/LR things
नींव:नींव   #foundation 
बाढ़:बाढ़   #flood
भेंट:भेंट #offering
नजर:नजर  #Dir/LR
कसम:कसम  #swear


LEXICON NounRoot[irr_f]
आँधी:आँध   #wind  
खुशी:खुश  #hapiness
रोशनी:रोशन  #light
बड़ाई:बड़ा  #praise
बुराई:बुरा  #evil
गलति:गलत   #mistake
चोरी:चोर  #steal
भविष्यवाणी:भविष्यवाण   #forecast
तैयारी:तैयार  #prepration
बिनती:बिनत  #request
चिठ्ठी:चिठ्ठ  #letter
कहानी:कहान  #story
रीति:रीत   #method
दासी:दास  #maid
टोकरी:टोकर  #basket


LEXICON NounRoot[irr_g]
गलति:गलति   #Dir/LR
रीति:रीति   #Dir/LR
बलि:बलि   #sacrifice/ offerings
शक्ति:शक्ति #power/ strength


LEXICON NounRoot[irr_h]
सूप्पो:सूप्पो    #a type of instrument
बैरी:बैरी  #enemy
प्रवेश:प्रवेश  #entery
तूफान:तूफान   #storm 
मूर्ख:मूर्ख   #fool
जबाब:जबाब     #answer
मरजी:मरजी     #wish
उपदेश:उपदेश  #advice/ teachings
प्रकार:प्रकार  #kind/ sort/ type
तरीका:तरीका  #way
असर:असर  #effect / impact
मक्शद:मक्शद  #motive
नानि:नानि  #girl child
नान:नान  #boy child
नान:नान  #child
पेट:पेट  #stomach
सुना:सुना  #gold
चाँदी:चाँदी   #silver

LEXICON NounRoot[irr_i]
भाई:भाई    #brother
दगड़ि:दगड़ि  #friend
प्राणी:प्राणी   #living beings
